Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6117.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-95. Community health workers.
(a) As used in this section, “community health worker” means a trained professional
providing services that are considered medically necessary for patients with one or more chronic
health, including behavioral health, conditions, patients who are at risk for a chronic health
condition, and/or who face barriers meeting their health or health-related social needs. Services that
can be provided by community health workers can include, but are not limited to:
(1) Health and promotion coaching;
(2) Health education and training;
(3) Health system navigation and resource coordination services;
(4) Care planning; and
(5) Follow-up care recommendations.
(b)(1) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for the services of a
community health worker in accordance with each health insurer's respective principles and
mechanisms of reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting, if the services are within the
community health worker's area of professional competence as defined by the community health

worker certification standard developed and maintained by the Rhode Island certification board in
collaboration with the department of health, and are currently reimbursed when rendered by any
other healthcare provider.
(2) No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation may require supervision,
signature, or referral by any other healthcare provider as a condition of reimbursement, except when
those requirements are also applicable to other categories of healthcare providers.
(3) No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation or patient may be required to pay
for duplicate services actually rendered by both a community health worker and any other
healthcare provider.
(c) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state that is required to cover community health worker services as defined in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall report utilization and cost information related to
community health worker services to the office of the health insurance commissioner on or before
July 1, 2027 and each July 1 thereafter. The office of the health insurance commissioner shall define
the utilization and cost information required to be reported.
(d) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Limited benefit health;
(6) Specified disease indemnity;
(7) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(8) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-87. Community health workers.
(a) As used in this section, “community health worker” means a trained professional
providing services that are considered medically necessary for patients with one or more chronic
health, including behavioral health, conditions, patients who are at risk for a chronic health
condition, and/or who face barriers meeting their health or health-related social needs. Services that
can be provided by community health workers can include, but are not limited to:
(1) Health and promotion coaching;
LC002543 - Page 2 of 8

(2) Health education and training;
(3) Health system navigation and resource coordination services;
(4) Care planning; and
(5) Follow-up care recommendations.
(b)(1) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for the services of a
community health worker in accordance with each health insurer's respective principles and
mechanisms of reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting, if the services are within the
community health worker's area of professional competence as defined by the community health
worker certification standard developed and maintained by the Rhode Island certification board in
collaboration with the department of health, and are currently reimbursed when rendered by any
other healthcare provider.
(2) No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation may require supervision,
signature, or referral by any other healthcare provider as a condition of reimbursement, except when
those requirements are also applicable to other categories of healthcare providers.
(3) No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation or patient may be required to pay
for duplicate services actually rendered by both a community health worker and any other
healthcare provider.
(c) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state that is required to cover community health worker services as defined in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall report utilization and cost information related to
community health worker services to the office of the health insurance commissioner on or before
July 1, 2027 and each July 1 thereafter. The office of the health insurance commissioner shall define
the utilization and cost information required to be reported.
(d) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Limited benefit health;
(6) Specified disease indemnity;
(7) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
LC002543 - Page 3 of 8

(8) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-83. Community health workers.
(a) As used in this section, “community health worker” means a trained professional
providing services that are considered medically necessary for patients with one or more chronic
health, including behavioral health, conditions, patients who are at risk for a chronic health
condition, and/or who face barriers meeting their health or health-related social needs. Services that
can be provided by community health workers can include, but are not limited to:
(1) Health and promotion coaching;
(2) Health education and training;
(3) Health system navigation and resource coordination services;
(4) Care planning; and
(5) Follow-up care recommendations.
(b)(1) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for the services of a
community health worker in accordance with each health insurer's respective principles and
mechanisms of reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting, if the services are within the
community health worker's area of professional competence as defined by the community health
worker certification standard developed and maintained by the Rhode Island certification board in
collaboration with the department of health, and are currently reimbursed when rendered by any
other healthcare provider.
(2) No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation may require supervision,
signature, or referral by any other healthcare provider as a condition of reimbursement, except when
those requirements are also applicable to other categories of healthcare providers.
(3) No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation or patient may be required to pay
for duplicate services actually rendered by both a community health worker and any other
healthcare provider.
(c) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state that is required to cover community health worker services as defined in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall report utilization and cost information related to
community health worker services to the office of the health insurance commissioner on or before
LC002543 - Page 4 of 8

July 1, 2027 and each July 1 thereafter. The office of the health insurance commissioner shall define
the utilization and cost information required to be reported.
(d) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Limited benefit health;
(6) Specified disease indemnity;
(7) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(8) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-100. Community health workers.
(a) As used in this section, “community health worker” means a trained professional
providing services that are considered medically necessary for patients with one or more chronic
health, including behavioral health, conditions, patients who are at risk for a chronic health
condition, and/or who face barriers meeting their health or health-related social needs. Services that
can be provided by community health workers can include, but are not limited to:
(1) Health and promotion coaching;
(2) Health education and training;
(3) Health system navigation and resource coordination services;
(4) Care planning; and
(5) Follow-up care recommendations.
(b)(1) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for the services of a
community health worker in accordance with each health insurer's respective principles and
mechanisms of reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting, if the services are within the
community health worker's area of professional competence as defined by the community health
worker certification standard developed and maintained by the Rhode Island certification board in
collaboration with the department of health, and are currently reimbursed when rendered by any
other healthcare provider.
(2) No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation may require supervision,
LC002543 - Page 5 of 8

signature, or referral by any other healthcare provider as a condition of reimbursement, except when
those requirements are also applicable to other categories of healthcare providers.
(3) No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation or patient may be required to pay
for duplicate services actually rendered by both a community health worker and any other
healthcare provider.
(c) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state that is required to cover community health worker services as defined in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall report utilization and cost information related to
community health worker services to the office of the health insurance commissioner on or before
July 1, 2027 and each July 1 thereafter. The office of the health insurance commissioner shall define
the utilization and cost information required to be reported.
(d) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Limited benefit health;
(6) Specified disease indemnity;
(7) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(8) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 5. Chapter 27-18.2 of the General Laws entitled "Medicare Supplement
Insurance Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18.2-12. Community health workers.
(a) As used in this section. "community health worker" means a trained professional
providing services that are considered medically necessary for patients with one or more chronic
health, including behavioral health, conditions, patients who are at risk for a chronic health
condition, and/or who face barriers meeting their health or health-related social needs. Services that
can be provided by community health workers can include. but are not limited to:
(1) Health and promotion coaching;
(2) Health education and training;
(3) Health system navigation and resource coordination services;
(4) Care planning; and
(5) Follow-up care recommendations.
LC002543 - Page 6 of 8

(b)(l) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for the services of a
community health worker in accordance with each health insurer's respective principles and
mechanisms of reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting, if the services are within the
community health worker's area of professional competence as defined by the community health
worker certification standard developed and maintained by the Rhode Island certification board in
collaboration with the department of health, and are currently reimbursed when rendered by any
other healthcare provider.
(2) No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation may require supervision,
signature, or referral by any other healthcare provider as a condition of reimbursement, except when
those requirements are also applicable to other categories of healthcare providers.
(3) No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation or patient may be required to pay
for duplicate services actually rendered by both a community health worker and any other
healthcare provider.
(c) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state that is required to cover community health worker services as defined in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall report utilization and cost information related to
community health worker services to the office of the health insurance commissioner on or before
July 1, 2027 and each July 1 thereafter. The office of the health insurance commissioner shall define
the utilization and cost information required to be reported.
(d) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Limited benefit health;
(6) Specified disease indemnity;
(7) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(8) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC002543
========
LC002543 - Page 7 of 8